New York, session 2025-2026, A2573.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 12 of the New York state printing and public docu- 2 ments law is amended by adding a new subdivision 5 to read as follows: 3 5. Each state agency shall make all public documents, as defined in 4 this article, available in a digital format on its website in a manner 5 that allows such documents to be printed. Under no circumstances shall 6 any document that is required by law to remain confidential be deemed a 7 public document. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 9 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05142-01-5